Tennessee, session 114, HB2595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 36, Chapter 6, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
36-6-505. Additional periods of parenting time after denial occurs due to false
allegations of abuse or neglect.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a court may order additional periods of
parenting time to compensate for a previous denial of visitation.
(b) If an affected parent can show that the other parent intentionally made or
participated in false allegations of abuse against the affected parent, then the court shall
order additional periods of parenting time to compensate the affected parent for a
previous denial of parenting time because of an investigation by the department of
children's services, or other agency, or a protective or restraining order, and the
investigation did not result in a finding of abuse or neglect.
(c) The additional parenting time ordered under this section is intended to
restore lost parenting time to the affected parent. The court-ordered additional parenting
time must not disrupt the child's school attendance or regular activities. Any additional
parenting time:
(1) Must be of the same type and duration as the parenting time that was
denied;
(2) May include weekend, holiday, or summer parenting time; and
HB2595
012609
- 1 -

(3) Must occur no later than two (2) years from the date the court denied
parenting time on grounds that did not result in a finding of abuse or neglect.
(d) The parent who was denied parenting time is entitled to request the dates for
the additional parenting time, consistent with subdivision (c)(1).
(e) This section does not:
(1) Create a cause of action against the department of children's
services, or any other agency; or
(2) Waive sovereign immunity to suit or liability.
SECTION 2. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to orders of visitation that are denied on or after that date.
- 2 - 012609